Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1112
Tax credit, defined.

Tax credit means a credit
against the tax otherwise due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or sections
44-101 to 44-165, 77-907 to 77-918, or 77-3801 to 77-3807.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 12.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.